Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.520

Disability leave supplement for law enforcement officers and firefighters—Employee to perform light duty tasks.

While an employee is receiving disability leave supplement, the employee, subject to the approval of his or her treating physician, shall perform light duty tasks in the employee's previous department as the employer may require, with no reduction in the disability leave supplement.

[ 1985 c 462 s 5.]

NOTES:

Program and fiscal review—1985 c 462: See note following RCW 41.04.500.